Connecticut, session 2026, HB05282.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 16a-31 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The following actions when undertaken by any state agency, with
state or federal funds, shall be consistent with the plan:
(1) The acquisition of real property when the acquisition costs [are in
excess of two hundred thousand] exceed one million dollars;
(2) The development or improvement of real property when the
development costs [are in excess of two hundred thousand] exceed one
million dollars; and
[(3) The acquisition of public transportation equipment or facilities
when the acquisition costs are in excess of two hundred thousand
dollars; and]
[(4)] (3) The authorization of each state grant, any application for
which [is not pending on July 1, 1991] was submitted (A) prior to

Substitute House Bill No. 5282
October 1, 2026, for an amount [in excess of] exceeding two hundred
thousand dollars, or (B) on or after October 1, 2026, for an amount
exceeding one million dollars, for the acquisition or development or
improvement of real property. [or for the acquisition of public
transportation equipment or facilities.]
(b) Not later than January 1, 2027, and every five years thereafter, the
secretary shall adjust the amounts described in subsection (a) of this
section by the percentage change in the Producer Price Index by
Commodity: Construction (Partial) (WPU80), not seasonally adjusted,
or its successor index, as calculated by the United States Department of
Labor, over the preceding five calendar years, rounded to the nearest
multiple of one hundred dollars. The secretary shall publish such
adjusted amounts on the Internet web site of the Office of Policy and
Management.
[(b) A] (c) Each state agency shall [request, and the secretary shall
provide, an advisory statement commenting on] submit to the secretary,
in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary, a notice describing
the extent to which any of the actions specified in subsection (a) of this
section [conforms] conform to the plan. [and any] An agency may
[request and] consult with the secretary [shall provide such other
advisory reports as the state agency deems advisable] prior to
submitting such notice.
[(c)] (d) The secretary shall submit, and the State Bond Commission
shall consider prior to the allocation of any bond funds for any of the
actions specified in subsection (a) of this section, an advisory statement
commenting on the extent to which such action is in conformity with the
plan of conservation and development.
[(d)] (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection [(b)] (c) of this
section, The University of Connecticut shall request, and the secretary
shall provide, an advisory statement commenting on the extent the
Public Act No. 26-126 2 of 5

Substitute House Bill No. 5282
projects included in the third phase of UConn 2000, as defined in
subdivision (25) of section 10a-109c, conform to the plan and the
university may request and the secretary shall provide such other
advisory reports as the university deems advisable. Notwithstanding
subsection [(c)] (d) of this section, the secretary shall submit and the
State Bond Commission shall consider prior to the approval of the
master resolution or indenture for securities for the third phase of
UConn 2000, pursuant to subsection (c) of section 10a-109g, the advisory
statement prepared under this subsection.
[(e)] (f) Whenever a state agency is required by state or federal law to
prepare a plan, it shall consider the state plan of conservation and
development in the preparation of such plan. A draft of such plan shall
be submitted to the secretary who shall provide for the preparer of the
plan an advisory report commenting on the extent to which the
proposed plan conforms to the state plan of conservation and
development.
Sec. 2. Subsection (g) of section 8-23 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(g) Any municipal plan of conservation and development scheduled
for adoption on or after July 1, [2015] 2026, shall identify the general
location and extent of any (1) areas served by existing sewerage systems,
(2) areas where sewerage systems are planned, and (3) areas where
sewers are to be avoided. In identifying such areas, the commission shall
consider the provisions of this section. [and the priority funding area
provisions of chapter 297a.]
Sec. 3. Subsection (a) of section 8-31c of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
Public Act No. 26-126 3 of 5

Substitute House Bill No. 5282
(a) (1) Wherever the term "regional planning agency" is used in the
following general statutes, the term "regional council of governments"
shall be substituted in lieu thereof; and (2) wherever the term "regional
planning agencies" is used in the following general statutes, the term
"regional councils of governments" shall be substituted in lieu thereof:
8-35b, 8-35c, 8-164, 8-166, 8-189, 8-336f, 8-384, 13b-38a, 13b-79ll, 16-32f,
16-50l, 16a-28, [16a-35c,] 22-26dd, 22a-102, 22a-118, 22a-137, 22a-207,
22a-352, 23-8, 25-33e to 25-33h, inclusive, 25-68d, 25-102qq and 25-233.
Sec. 4. Subsection (d) of section 16a-27 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(d) Any revision made after July 1, [2005] 2026, shall describe the
progress towards achievement of the goals and objectives established in
the previously adopted state plan of conservation and development and
shall identify (1) areas where it is prudent and feasible (A) to have
compact, transit accessible, pedestrian-oriented mixed-use
development patterns and land reuse, and (B) to promote such
development patterns and land reuse, and (2) [priority funding areas
designated under section 16a-35c, and (3)] corridor management areas
on either side of a limited access highway or a rail line. In designating
corridor management areas, the secretary shall make recommendations
that (A) promote land use and transportation options to reduce the
growth of traffic congestion; (B) connect infrastructure and other
development decisions; (C) promote development that minimizes the
cost of new infrastructure facilities and maximizes the use of existing
infrastructure facilities; and (D) increase intermunicipal and regional
cooperation.
Sec. 5. Sections 16a-35c to 16a-35h, inclusive, of the general statutes
are repealed. (Effective July 1, 2026)
Public Act No. 26-126 4 of 5

Substitute House Bill No. 5282
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-126 5 of 5